Iowa, session 2025-2026, SF601.
BE IT ENACTED BY THE GENERAL ASSEMBLY OF THE STATE OF IOWA: 4 TLSB 2373SV (3) 91 sb/js S.F. 601 Section 1. Section 388.2A, subsection 2, paragraph g, 1 subparagraph (1), Code 2025, is amended to read as follows: 2 (1) The governing body shall make available on its internet 3 site, at least sixty thirty days prior to submitting a proposal 4 for election pursuant to section 388.2 , a copy of each item 5 listed in paragraphs âaâ through âfâ of this subsection . 6